District of Columbia statutes.
43-127

Prosecutions.

Prosecutions hereunder shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in the name of said District; provided, that any person or persons so tried shall have the privilege, when demanded, of a trial by jury, as in other jury cases in said Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1298, ch. 854, § 685
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 27-127.
1973 Ed., § 27-127.